Utah statutes.
78A-6-701.   Jurisdiction of district court.
(1)  The district court has exclusive original jurisdiction over all persons
16 years of age or older charged with:
(a)  an offense which would be murder or aggravated murder if committed by an
adult; or
(b)  an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult if the minor
has been previously committed to a secure facility as defined in Section
62A-7-101.  This Subsection (1)(b) shall not apply if the offense is committed
in a secure facility.
(2)  When the district court has exclusive original jurisdiction over a minor
under this section, it also has exclusive original jurisdiction over the minor
regarding all offenses joined with the qualifying offense, and any other
offenses, including misdemeanors, arising from the same criminal episode.  The
district court is not divested of jurisdiction by virtue of the fact that the
minor is allowed to enter a plea to, or is found guilty of, a lesser or joined
offense.
(3) (a)  Any felony, misdemeanor, or infraction committed after the offense
over which the district court takes jurisdiction under Subsection (1) or (2)
shall be tried against the defendant as an adult in the district court or
justice court having jurisdiction.
(b)  If the qualifying charge under Subsection (1) results in an acquittal, a
finding of not guilty, or a dismissal of the charge in the district court, the
juvenile court under Section 78A-6-103 and the Division of Juvenile Justice
Services regain any jurisdiction and authority previously exercised over the
minor.
